test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-salaandw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - salāndõ: # Verb 53 'eng /est varastada/fin' - full paradigm
     salāndõ+V+Inf: salāndõ
     salāndõ+V+Ger: salāndõs
     salāndõ+V+Sup: salāndõm
     salāndõ+V+Sup+Ine: salāndõmõs
     salāndõ+V+Sup+Ela: salāndõmõst
     salāndõ+V+Sup+Tra: salāndõmõks
     salāndõ+V+Sup+Abe: salāndõmõt
     salāndõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: salāndõb
     salāndõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: salāndõt
     salāndõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: salāndõbõd
     salāndõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: salāndiz
     salāndõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [salāndizt, salāndiztõ]
     salāndõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [salāndizt, salāndiztõ]
     salāndõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: salānd
     salāndõ+V+Cond+Sg3: salāndõks
     salāndõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: salānd
     salāndõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: salānd
     salāndõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: salāndõgid
     salāndõ+V+Jus+Sg3: salāndõg
     salāndõ+V+Quo+Sg3: salāndiji
     salāndõ+V+ActPrfPrc: salāndõn
     salāndõ+V+PssPrfPrc: salāndtõd
